Illinois, session 104th, SB905.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Removal of Private Compromising Images Act 5is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (735 ILCS 115/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Removal of Private Compromising Images Act.9(Source: P.A. 101-385, eff. 1-1-20.)